src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ACCRA-malfem
   ACCRA-mal ;
   ACCRA-fem ;

!LEXICON INAME-plc
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: INAME_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: INAME_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
!
!LEXICON INAME-plcorg
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: INAME_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: INAME_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org: INAME_PLC-ORG_FLAG ;

!LEXICON INAME_PLC-ORG_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ INAME_PLC-ORG ;
!LEXICON INAME_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
! +Sg+Nom:i      FINAL1 ;
!        :i      RHyph  ;
!+Cmp/SgNom:i    RHyph  ;
!+Cmp/SgGen:i    RHyph  ;
!
! +Sg+Acc:i%>m   FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Gen:i%>n   FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ill+Uml:an FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Com:%>ine  FINAL1 ;
!    +Ess:%>ine  FINAL1 ;
!    +Attr:i      FINAL1 ;


!LEXICON OENAME-sur
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: OENAME ;
!


!LEXICON OENAME-mal
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: OENAME ;
!

!LEXICON OENAME
! SNAME_NIEJTE ;


!LEXICON ONAME-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ONAME_PLC-ORG ;

!LEXICON ONAME-org
!+N+Prop+Sem/Org: ONAME_PLC-ORG ;

!LEXICON ONAME-sur
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ONAME ;

!LEXICON ONAME-obj
!+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ONAME ;
!
!LEXICON ONAME-mal
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ONAME ;

!LEXICON ONAME-fem
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ONAME ;

!LEXICON ONAME
!  VNAME ; !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:           FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Err/Orth:           RHyph ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:e%>m       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:e%>n       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>m        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>n        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>se       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:%>sne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:%>ste      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>jne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
!
!! the sne / snie business remains to be sorted out.
!
!
!LEXICON ONAME_PLC-ORG
!  VNAME_PLC-ORG ; !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:           FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Err/Orth:           RHyph ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:e%>m       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:e%>n       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>m        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>n        FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>se       FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:%>sne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:%>ste      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
! +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>jne      FINAL1 ; ! !until we get answer from SGM
!
!! the sne / snie business remains to be sorted out.



!LEXICON UENAME-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: UENAME_PLC-ORG ;
!
!LEXICON UENAME-sur
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: UENAME ;
!

!LEXICON UENAME-mal
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: UENAME ;


!LEXICON UENAME
!SNAME_NIEJTE ;
!
!LEXICON UENAME_PLC-ORG
!SNAME_NIEJTE_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON UNAME-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: UNAME_PLC-ORG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: UNAME_PLC-ORG ;

!LEXICON UNAME-ani
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: UNAME_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON UNAME-sur
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME-obj
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: UNAME ;

LEXICON UNAME
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA      ; !until we get answer from SGM
 +Err/Orth@U.Cap.Obl@:0@U.Cap.Obl@ UNAME_EVEN ; ! !until we get answer from SGM

LEXICON UNAME_PLC-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA_PLC-ORG ; !until we get answer from SGM
 +Err/Orth@U.Cap.Obl@:0@U.Cap.Obl@ UNAME_EVEN ; ! !until we get answer from SGM

!This is a standardization issues 
LEXICON UNAME_EVEN
 +Sg+Nom:        FINAL1 ; ! Forms are subbed above until we get answer from SGM
 +Cmp/SgNom: RHyph  ;
 +Cmp/SgGen: RHyph  ;


 +Sg+Acc:ve%>m   FINAL1 ; ! Forms are subbed above until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Gen:ve%>n   FINAL1 ; ! Forms are subbed above until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ill:ve%>se  FINAL1 ; ! Forms are subbed above until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ine:ve%>sne FINAL1 ; ! Forms are subbed above until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Ela:ve%>ste FINAL1 ; ! Forms are subbed above until we get answer from SGM
 +Sg+Com:ve%>jne FINAL1 ; ! Forms are subbed above until we get answer from SGM


!LEXICON ZEENAME-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ZEENAME_PLC_ORG ;
!
!LEXICON ZEENAME-sur
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ZEENAME ;
!
!LEXICON ZEENAME-fem
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ZEENAME ;

!LEXICON ZEENAME
! +Sg+Nom:e          FINAL1 ;
! :e          RHyph ;
! +Sg+Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Com:e%>ine      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Nom:e%>h       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Acc:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Gen:e%>i       FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ill:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ine:e%>ine      FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Ela:e%>iste    FINAL1 ;
! +Pl+Com:e%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
! +Ess:e%>ine         FINAL1 ;
! +Attr:e FINAL1 ;
!
!LEXICON ZEENAME_PLC_ORG
! +Sg+Nom:e          FINAL1 ;
! :e          RHyph ;
! +Sg+Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
! +Sg+Com:e%>ine      FINAL1 ;
!! +Pl+Nom:e%>h       FINAL1 ;
!! +Pl+Acc:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
!! +Pl+Gen:e%>i       FINAL1 ;
!! +Pl+Ill:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
!! +Pl+Ine:e%>ine      FINAL1 ;
!! +Pl+Ela:e%>iste    FINAL1 ;
!! +Pl+Com:e%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
! +Ess:e%>ine         FINAL1 ;
! +Attr:e FINAL1 ;

!LEXICON INAME_ODD-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: INAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;
!
!LEXICON INAME_ODD-sur
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: INAME_ODD ;
!
!LEXICON INAME_ODD-mal
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: INAME_ODD ;
!
!LEXICON INAME_ODD-fem
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: INAME_ODD ;


! LEXICON INAME_ODD ! Names ending in stressless vowel
!  +Sg+Nom:%>i         FINAL1 ;
!  :%>i         RHyph ;
! +Sg: INAME_ODD_SG ; ! name special
! +Pl: N_ODD_PL ;     ! normal noun
! :    N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
! +Attr:%>i FINAL1 ;     ! name special
!
! LEXICON INAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ! Names ending in stressless vowel
!  +Sg+Nom:%>i         FINAL1 ;
!  :%>i         RHyph ;
! +Sg: INAME_ODD_SG ; ! name special
!! +Pl: N_ODD_PL ;     ! normal noun
! :    N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
! +Attr:%>i FINAL1 ;     ! name special
!

LEXICON INAME_ODD_SG
      +Acc:%>im      FINAL1 ;
      +Gen:%>in      FINAL1 ;
      +Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
      +Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
      +Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
      +Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;



LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: PERS_SNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD-fem
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: PERS_SNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: PERS_SNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: PERS_SNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: PERS_SNAME_ODD_FLAG ;

LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD_FLAG @U.Cap.Obl@ PERS_SNAME_ODD ;
LEXICON PERS_SNAME_ODD
    +Sg+Acc:%>em      FINAL1 ;
    +Sg+Gen:%>en      FINAL1 ;
    +Sg+Ill:%>asse    FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
    +Sg+Ine:%>isnie   FINAL1 ;
    +Sg+Ela:%>istie   FINAL1 ;
    +Sg+Com:%>inie    FINAL1 ;
    +Sg+Nom:%>e       FINAL1 ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>e       RHyph  ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>e       RHyph  ;

    +Pl+Nom:%>eh      FINAL1 ;
        +Pl:          N_ODD_PL  ;
                      N_ODD_ESS ;
      +Attr:%>e       FINAL1    ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:@U.Cap.Obl@e%»tj GÅATETJE ; !Åvletje

LEXICON MOLDAVIA-plc
:j SNAME_ODD-plc ;

LEXICON MOLDAVIA-LOAN-plc
:j SNAME_ODD-plc ;

LEXICON MALAWI-plc
:ij SNAME_ODD-plc ;

LEXICON MACKENZIE-plc
:j SNAME_ODD-plc ;

LEXICON SNAME_ODD-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: SNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;


LEXICON SNAME_ODD-org
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org: SNAME_ODD_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON SNAME_ODD-ani
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani: SNAME_ODD_FLAG ;
