src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aarpije:Aarpij SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Abu:Abu UNAME-mal ;
Aerhtsege:Aerhtsieg SNAME_ODD-plc "13 TERRTX" ;
Avihu:Avihu UNAME-mal ;
Baktuse:Baktus PERS_SNAME_ODD-ani ;
Baku:Baku UNAME-plc ;
Ballore:Balloer SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Baotou:Baotou UNAME-plc ;
Bierpehke:Bierpehk SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Bijjie-Sipmehke:Bijjie-Sipmehk SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Byrkije:Byrkij SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Båålege:Bååleg SNAME_ODD-plc "61 VATTTX" ;
Daarnege:Daarneg SNAME_ODD-plc "62 VATTTX" ;
Deatnu:Deatnu UNAME-plc ;
Dreejhöönine:Dreej^höönin SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Eerhtsege:Eerhtseg SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Furu:Furu UNAME-plc ;
Galilea+Use/Sub:Gaalijl SNAME_ODD-plc ; ! går som gaaltije
Gajhtohke:Gajhtoehk SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Gierege:Giereg SNAME_ODD-plc "61 VATTDRTX" ;
Gievkere:Gievker SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Guevtele:Guevtiel SNAME_ODD-plc "13 TERRTX" ;
Haamehke:Haamehk SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Halttu:Halttu UNAME-sur ;
Hamamatsu:Hamamatsu UNAME-plc ;
Hannu:Hannu UNAME-mal ;
Harju:Harju UNAME-sur ;
Hauru:Hauru UNAME-sur ;
Heerodese:Heerodes PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal ; 
Henttu:Henttu UNAME-sur ;
Honolulu:Honolulu UNAME-plc ;
Horppu:Horppu UNAME-sur ;
Husu:Husu UNAME-sur ;
Hålogalaanteallmenninge+Use/Sub:Håloga^laante^allmenning SNAME_ODD-org ; !
Igaliku:Igaliku UNAME-plc ;
Isopoussu:Iso^poussu UNAME-sur ;
Isuzu:Isuzu UNAME-plc ;
Jeesuse:Jeesus PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal ; !Ordinary nominative Jeesuse
Jerkku:Jerkku UNAME-sur ;
Jesu:Jesu UNAME-org ;
Jetsu:Jetsu UNAME-plc ;
Jillie% Aapeje:Jillie% Aapej SNAME_ODD-plc "21 VATTDRTX" ;
Joevrehke:Joevrehk SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Jupmele:Jupmiel SNAME_ODD-ani ;
Jurmu:Jurmu UNAME-sur ;
Kaarije:Kaarij PERS_SNAME_ODD-fem ;
Kainu:Kainu UNAME-plc ;
Karhu:Karhu UNAME-sur ;
Karijuse:Karijus PERS_SNAME_ODD-ani ;
Keisu:Keisu UNAME-plc ;
Kettu:Kettu UNAME-sur ;
Kirppu:Kirppu UNAME-plc ;
Kismayu:Kisma^yu UNAME-plc ;
Kiuttu:Ki^uttu UNAME-sur ;
Klingere:Klinger SNAME_ODD-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Koivu:Koivu UNAME-sur ;
Komu:Komu UNAME-sur ;
Konu:Konu UNAME-plc ;
Kormu:Kormu UNAME-plc ;
Kristuse:Kristus PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal ; 
Kropsu:Kropsu UNAME-sur ;
Kulju:Kulju UNAME-plc ;
Kumpu:Kumpu UNAME-sur ;
Kurittu:Kurittu UNAME-sur ;
Kursu:Kursu UNAME-plc ;
Laatu:Laatu UNAME-sur ;
Laavele:Laavel SNAME_ODD-plc "26 TERRTX" ;
Lahdensivu:Lahden^sivu UNAME-plc ;
Lamppu:Lamppu UNAME-sur ;
Lanu:Lanu UNAME-plc ;
Lasaruse:Lasarus PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal ;
Leimu:Leimu UNAME-sur ;
Liehu:Liehu UNAME-sur ;
Liukku:Li^ukku UNAME-sur ;
Luikku:Luikku UNAME-sur ;
Lååbpehke:Lååbpehk SNAME_ODD-plc "9 VATTDRTX" ;
Machu:Machu UNAME-plc ;
Manu:Manu UNAME-plc ;
Memuru:Memuru UNAME-plc ;
Mouhu:Mouhu UNAME-plc ;
Movsese:Movses PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal ;
Muikku:Muikku UNAME-sur ;
Mäensivu:Mä^en^sivu UNAME-sur ;
Mäntyharju:Mänty^harju UNAME-plc ;
Måarenguevtele:Måaren^guevtiel SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Nehru:Nehru UNAME-plc ;
Norfu:Norfu UNAME-mal ;
Novlemaanege:Novle^maaneg SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Oahu:Oahu UNAME-plc ;
Ojansivu:Ojan^sivu UNAME-sur ;
Palmu:Palmu UNAME-sur ;
Paukku:Paukku UNAME-sur ;
Pengpu:Pengpu UNAME-plc ;
Perttu:Perttu UNAME-mal ;
Pijlatuse:Pijlatus PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal ;
Pingkele:Pingkel SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Pouru:Pouru UNAME-sur ;
Pïehtere:Pïehter PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal ;
Raerienguevtele:Raerien^guevtiel SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Rehu:Rehu UNAME-org ;
Reittu:Reittu UNAME-sur ;
Remsu:Remsu UNAME-plc ;
Rihu:Rihu UNAME-mal ;
Rousku:Rousku UNAME-sur ;
Ruusu:Ruusu UNAME-fem ;
Saarikettu:Saari^kettu UNAME-sur ;
Sipmehke:Sipmehk SNAME_ODD-plc "13 TERRTX" ;
Slitu:Slitu UNAME-plc ;
Snohtjele:Snohtjel SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Sointu:Sointu UNAME-fem ;
Stoere% Tjohkele:Stoere% Tjohkel SNAME_ODD-plc "21 TERRTX" ;
Subaru:Subaru UNAME-org ;
Svijjege:Svijjeg SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Taarjeje:Taarjej PERS_SNAME_ODD-mal ;
Tanttu:Tanttu UNAME-sur ;
Thimphu:Thimphu UNAME-plc ;
Tjohkele:Tjohkel SNAME_ODD-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Treu:Treu UNAME-plc ;
Tîrgu:Tîrgu UNAME-plc ;
Uuttu:Uuttu UNAME-sur ;
Vaalere:Vaaler SNAME_ODD-plc "62 TERRTX" ;
Virsu:Virsu UNAME-sur ;
Vuaktere:Vuaktar SNAME_ODD-plc ; 
Vulu:Vulu UNAME-plc ;
Væssj-Bualehke:Væssj-Bualehk SNAME_ODD-ani ;
Yanbu:Yanbu UNAME-plc ;
ÁLGU:ÁLGU UNAME-obj ;
Åarjel% Guevtele:Åarjel% Guevtiel SNAME_ODD-plc "13 TERRTX" ;
